Hawaii statutes.
[§5-12] State marine mammal. The
humpback whale is established and designated as the official marine mammal of
the State, to be effective so long as the legislature of the State does not
otherwise provide. [L 1979, c 110, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next